Illinois, session 104th, HB1567.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Finance Authority Act is amended 5by adding Section 825-120 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3501/825-120 new)7    Sec. 825-120. Squad Car Revolving Loan Program.8    (a) The Illinois Finance Authority and the Illinois Law 9Enforcement Training and Standards Board may jointly 10administer a squad car revolving loan program. The program 11shall, in instances where sufficient loan funds exist to 12permit applications to be accepted, provide zero-interest 13loans for the purchase of squad cars by local Illinois law 14enforcement agencies. The Authority shall make loans based on 15need, as determined by the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 16and Standards Board. 17    (b) The loan funds shall be paid, subject to 18appropriation, out of the Squad Car Revolving Loan Fund, a 19special fund in the State Treasury. The Squad Car Revolving 20Loan Fund shall consist of any moneys transferred or 21appropriated into the Squad Car Revolving Loan Fund and all 22repayments of loans made under the squad car revolving loan 23program. The Squad Car Revolving Loan Fund shall be used for   HB1567- 2 -LRB104 05969 HLH 16002 b1loans to local Illinois law enforcement agencies to purchase 2squad cars and for no other purpose. All interest earned on 3moneys in the Fund shall be deposited into the Fund. 4    (c) No local Illinois law enforcement agency may receive a 5loan under this Section that exceeds $250,000. No local 6Illinois law enforcement agency is eligible for a second or 7subsequent loan under this Section until that local Illinois 8law enforcement agency has repaid at least 50% of the amount 9borrowed under the terms of each of the previous loans awarded 10to the local Illinois law enforcement agency under this 11Section. The repayment period for the loan may not exceed 5 12years. The local Illinois law enforcement agency shall repay 13each year at least 20% of the principal amount borrowed or the 14remaining balance of the loan, whichever is less. All 15repayments of loans under this Section shall be deposited into 16the Squad Car Revolving Loan Fund. 17    (d) The Authority, in consultation with the Illinois Law 18Enforcement Training and Standards Board, may adopt rules to 19administer this Section. 20    (e) As used in this Section:21    "Local Illinois law enforcement agency" means an agency of 22any municipality or county that is vested by law or ordinance 23with the duty to maintain public order and to enforce criminal 24laws or ordinances.  25    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding   HB1567- 3 -LRB104 05969 HLH 16002 b1Section 5.1030 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)3    Sec. 5.1030. The Squad Car Revolving Loan Fund.